Idaho statutes. Title 69 WAREHOUSES
Chapter 2
BONDED WAREHOUSE LAW

Sec.

§ 69-201. Short title of act.

This act shall be known by the short title of bonded warehouse law.

§ 69-202. Definitions.

As used in this chapter:

“Agricultural commodity” or “commodity” means any grain, wheat, barley, oats, corn, rye, oilseeds, dry edible beans, peas, lentils and other leguminous seeds and feeds (not including minerals or seed crops) or any other commodity as determined by the director.

“Commodity dealer” or “dealer” means any person who solicits, contracts for, or obtains from an Idaho producer or producers, title, possession or control of any agricultural commodity through his place of business located in the state of Idaho or through his place of business located outside the state of Idaho for the purposes of sale or resale or who buys, during a calendar year, at least ten thousand dollars ($10,000) worth of agricultural commodities from an Idaho producer or producers of the commodities. Commodity dealer or dealer shall not mean any person who purchases agricultural commodities for his own use as seed or feed within his own operation.

“Contract” means a written agreement between two (2) or more parties for the sale of an agricultural commodity stipulating the terms and conditions of performance of the parties and includes, but is not limited to, those contracts commonly referred to as credit sales, deferred payment, delayed, production, bailment or price later contracts.

“Deliver” or “delivery” means the physical transfer of agricultural commodity from one (1) party to another.

“Department” means the Idaho state department of agriculture.

“Depositor” means any person who deposits an agricultural commodity in an Idaho state licensed warehouse for storage, handling, processing, reconditioning or shipment, or who is the owner or legal holder of a negotiable warehouse receipt, outstanding scale weight ticket, nonnegotiable warehouse receipt or other evidence of such deposit, or any person whose agricultural commodity has been sold to or is under control of a warehouseman for selling, processing, reconditioning or handling whether or not such agricultural commodity is within the warehouse.

“Director” means the director of the Idaho state department of agriculture.

“Failure” means the date that one (1) or more of the following events occurred, as determined by the director:

An inability to financially satisfy claimants in accordance with this chapter and the time limits provided for in it;

A public declaration of insolvency;

A revocation of license and the leaving of an outstanding indebtedness to a depositor or producer;

A failure to redeliver any commodity to a depositor or to pay depositors or producers for commodities purchased by a licensee or to pay a producer for commodity delivered under the provisions of the contract in the ordinary course of business;

A failure to make application for license renewal within sixty (60) days after the annual license renewal date; or

A denial of the application for a license renewal.

“Historical depositor” means any person who, in the normal course of business operation has consistently made deposits in the same warehouse of commodities produced on the same land. In addition, anyone purchasing or leasing that particular land directly from the original depositor or receiving that particular land by devise, descent, bequest or gift directly from the historical depositor shall also be considered an historical depositor with regard to the commodities produced on that land.
(10) “Person” means any individual, firm, association, corporation, partnership or limited liability company.

(11) “Producer” means the owner, tenant or operator of land in this state who has an interest in the proceeds from the sale of agricultural commodities produced on that land. Producer does not include growers who deposit their commodity in a facility in which they have a financial or management interest, except members of a cooperative marketing association qualified under chapter 26, title 22, Idaho Code.

(12) “Public warehouse” or “warehouse” or “warehouseman” means any elevator, mill, warehouse, subterminal commodity warehouse, public warehouse or other structure or facility in which agricultural commodities are received for storage, shipment, processing, reconditioning or handling.

(13) “Receipt” means a warehouse receipt.

(14) “Revocation” means the permanent removal of a warehouse license following a hearing on violations of this chapter by the hearing officer or director.

(15) “Scale weight ticket” means a load slip or other evidence, other than a receipt, given to a depositor by a warehouseman licensed under the provisions of this chapter, upon initial delivery of the commodity to the warehouse.

(16) “Seed crops” means any seed crop regulated by chapter 4, title 22, Idaho Code.

(17) “Subterminal warehouse” means any warehouse at which an intermediate function is performed in which agricultural commodities are customarily received from dealers rather than producers and where the commodities are accumulated prior to shipment.

(18) “Suspension” means the temporary removal of a warehouse license by the department pending a hearing for violations of this chapter. Correction of the violations prior to a hearing may result in the reinstatement of a license without a hearing.

(19) “Termination” means the expiration of a warehouse license due to failure to meet minimum licensing requirements, failure to renew a warehouse license or as requested by the licensee, unless a complaint has been filed against the licensee alleging a violation of any provision of this chapter.

(20) “Transfer” means, unless otherwise defined by the parties in writing, the event when a producer or his agent delivers a commodity to a warehouseman, who then weighs the commodity, and gives the producer or his agent a scale weight ticket or other written evidence of transfer.

(21) “Warehouse receipt” means every receipt, whether negotiable or nonnegotiable, issued by a warehouseman, except scale weight tickets.

(22) “Warehouseman” means a person operating or controlling a public warehouse.

§ 69-203. License necessary to operate public warehouse.

Before a person can lawfully operate a public warehouse in this state, he must procure a license under this chapter; provided however, that the foregoing requirement as to licenses is not applicable to any warehouse or warehouseman who is licensed under an act of congress approved August 11, 1916 (39 Statutes at Large 44 [486]) and acts amendatory thereof, commonly called the “United States Warehouse Act,” and who is licensed under chapter 5, title 69, Idaho Code.

§ 69-204. Penalty for operating without a license — Misrepresentation.

Any person operating a public warehouse without a license or in any way representing, by actions or words, that the warehouse is so licensed when such warehouse is not so licensed or any person who shall misrepresent, forge, alter, counterfeit or falsely represent a license as required by the provisions of this chapter shall be guilty of a felony and punished by imprisonment in the state prison for not more than ten (10) years, or by a fine of not more than ten thousand dollars ($10,000), or by both.

Any person who shall issue, utter, or aid in the issuance or utterance or attempt to issue or utter a false or fraudulent receipt for any commodity shall be guilty of a felony and punished by imprisonment in the state prison for not more than ten (10) years, or by a fine of not more than ten thousand dollars ($10,000), or by both.

§ 69-205. Inspection and classification of warehouses, storage, warehousing, weighing and certification of commodities — Duties of warehousemen.

Upon application by any person for license to conduct a warehouse under this chapter, the department is authorized to investigate and determine whether the public warehouse for which licenses are applied, or have been previously issued, under this chapter, is suitable for the proper storage of agricultural commodities and the department is authorized with or without application, to wit:

To inspect any warehouse licensed under this chapter; to inspect every licensed warehouse at least once every calendar year; to investigate the storage, warehousing, classifying according to grade, and otherwise weighing and certification of agricultural commodities therein conducted; to classify warehouses, licensed or applying for license, in accordance with their capacity and to prescribe, within the limitations of this chapter, the duties of the warehousemen conducting warehouses licensed under this chapter with respect to their care of and responsibility for agricultural commodities.

§ 69-206. Licenses to warehousemen — Issue — Renewal — Conditions precedent.

The department is authorized, upon application to it, to issue or renew to any warehouseman a license for the conduct of a warehouse or warehouses in accordance with this chapter and such rules as may be made hereunder, providing the following conditions are met:

Each person, as a condition precedent to operating a warehouse in this state, shall file and maintain satisfactory evidence with the director of the existence of an effective policy of insurance issued by an insurance company authorized to do business in this state, insuring all agricultural commodities that may be stored or accepted for storage on the premises, including commodities owned by the warehouseman, for which such license is sought for the full market value of such agricultural commodities against loss by fire, internal explosion, lightning or tornado;

That each warehouse be found suitable for the proper storage of the particular agricultural commodity or commodities for which a license is requested;

A license fee is submitted to the department as prescribed by section 69-211, Idaho Code;

A current drawing of the warehouse which shows storage facilities and the capacity calculations of the warehouse which indicates commodity and seed crop storage areas, shall be approved by the department;

A sufficient and valid bond is filed and maintained as required by section 69-208, Idaho Code;

The applicant shall submit to the department an audited or reviewed financial statement prepared by an independent certified public accountant or licensed public accountant showing that the licensee has and does maintain current assets equal to or greater than current liabilities, a statement of current assets and current liabilities, and a statement of net worth, all of which shall be prepared in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles;

For a warehouseman license an applicant shall have and maintain a net worth of at least fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) or maintain a bond in the amount of two thousand dollars ($2,000) for each one thousand dollars ($1,000) or fraction thereof of net worth financial requirement; however, a person shall not be licensed as a warehouseman if the person has a net worth of less than twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000). A bond submitted for purposes of this subsection shall be in addition to any bond otherwise required under the provisions of this chapter;

The applicant has complied with and abided by all the terms of this chapter and the rules prescribed hereunder;

§ 69-207. Term of license — Renewal.

Each license issued under sections 69-206 and 69-215, Idaho Code, shall be issued for a period to be prescribed by rule by the department.

§ 69-208. Bond of applicant for license — Additional bond — Additional obligations — Certificate of deposit or irrevocable letter of credit in lieu of bond — Single bond.

Each warehouseman applying for a license to conduct a warehouse in accordance with this chapter shall, as a condition to the granting thereof, execute and file with the department a good and sufficient bond other than personal security. The bond shall be in favor of the commodity indemnity fund to secure the faithful performance of his obligations as a warehouseman under all the laws of the state, including obligations arising by operation of the commodity indemnity fund program, and the rules prescribed hereunder, and of such additional obligations as a warehouseman as may be assumed by him under contracts with the respective depositors of agricultural commodities in such warehouse. Said bond shall be in such form and amount, shall have such surety or sureties, and shall contain such terms and conditions as the department may prescribe to carry out the purposes of this chapter. Whenever the department shall determine that a bond approved by it is, or for any cause has become, insufficient, it shall require an additional bond or bonds to be given by the warehouseman concerned, conforming with the requirements of this section, and unless the same be given within the time fixed by a written demand therefor the license of such warehouseman shall be suspended or revoked.

The bond shall be approved by the department and shall be conditioned upon the faithful performance by the warehouseman of the duty to keep in the warehouse for the depositor the agricultural commodity delivered and to deliver the agricultural commodity to or for such depositors. The bond shall also be conditioned upon the faithful performance by the warehouseman of any additional obligations involving marketing transactions with a depositor.

The warehouseman may give a single bond meeting the requirements as provided in this chapter and all warehouses operated by the warehouseman shall be as one (1) warehouse for the purpose of compliance with the provisions of this section. At the discretion of the director, any person required to submit a bond to the department in accordance with this chapter, may give to the department a certificate of deposit or an irrevocable letter of credit payable to the commodity indemnity fund in lieu of the bond required herein. The principal amount of the certificate of deposit or irrevocable letter of credit shall be the same as that required for a surety bond pursuant to this chapter. Accrued interest upon the certificate of deposit shall be payable to the purchaser of the certificate. The irrevocable letter of credit or certificate of deposit shall remain on file with the department until it is released, canceled or discharged by the director or until the director is notified ninety (90) days in advance, by registered or certified mail, return receipt requested, that the irrevocable letter of credit or certificate of deposit is renewed, canceled or amended. Failure to notify the director may result in the suspension or revocation of the bonded warehouse license. The provisions of this chapter that apply to a bond required pursuant to this chapter apply to each certificate of deposit or irrevocable letter of credit given in lieu of such bond.
Under provisions of this chapter, an irrevocable letter of credit or certificate of deposit shall not be acceptable unless it is issued by a national bank or federal thrift institution in Idaho or by a state-chartered bank or thrift institution authorized to conduct business in Idaho and insured by the federal deposit insurance corporation.

Any changes in the capacity of a warehouse or installation of any new warehouses involving a change in the bond liability under the provisions of this chapter shall be reported to the department prior to the operation thereof.

If a warehouseman is licensed pursuant to chapter 51, title 22, Idaho Code, that same warehouseman may obtain a single bond, certificate of deposit or irrevocable letter of credit as surety for both chapter 2, title 69, Idaho Code, and chapter 51, title 22, Idaho Code. If a single bond, certificate of deposit or irrevocable letter of credit is written covering chapter 2, title 69, Idaho Code, and chapter 51, title 22, Idaho Code, the bond, certificate of deposit or irrevocable letter of credit shall be made out in favor of the commodity indemnity fund and the seed indemnity fund. In the event a warehouseman fails as defined in section 69-202(8), Idaho Code, and a single bond, certificate of deposit or irrevocable letter of credit is written in favor of the commodity indemnity fund and seed indemnity fund, the proceeds of the bond, certificate of deposit or irrevocable letter of credit will be allocated based on the dollar amount of the verified claims approved pursuant to chapter 2, title 69, Idaho Code, and chapter 51, title 22, Idaho Code.

§ 69-208A. Amount of bond — Cancellation.

The amount of bond to be furnished for each warehouse shall be fixed at whichever of the following amounts is greater:

The combined total indebtedness paid and owed to producers for agricultural commodity and seed crop stored for withdrawal or transferred during the previous license year; or

The indebtedness owed and estimated to be owed to producers for agricultural commodity and seed crop for the current license year.

Subsequent to determining whichever of the preceding amounts is greater, and based on that amount, the amount of bond shall be calculated as follows:

Gross Dollars: Amount of Bond:

$0 - $450,000 $20,000 bond or 6% of the gross

dollars, whichever is less

$450,001 - $1,000,000 $40,000 bond

$1,000,001 - $8,000,000 $100,000 bond

Over $8,000,000 $500,000 bond

Any other bond that may be required shall be separate and in addition to the bond listed here. In any case, the amount of the bond shall not be more than five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000). This bond shall run continuously with the warehouse license until suspended, revoked or canceled by the bonding company. A ninety (90) day written notice shall be given to the department by the bonding company before any bond is suspended, revoked or canceled. The director reserves the right to waive the ninety (90) day cancellation period.

§ 69-209. Action on bond, certificate of deposit or irrevocable letter of credit by producers injured.

Any producer injured by the breach of any obligation for which a bond, certificate of deposit or irrevocable letter of credit is written, under the provisions of section 69-208, Idaho Code, must petition the director to make demand upon the warehouseman, certificate of deposit, irrevocable letter of credit or bond. The director may thereupon make demand for payment of such damages and in the event such damages are not promptly paid the director may commence an action to enforce payment of such damages. The liability of the bank on a certificate of deposit or irrevocable letter of credit, and the surety upon the bond required to be given by warehousemen as provided in section 69-208, Idaho Code, for any one (1) annual licensing period shall be limited to the amount specified in the bond, certificate of deposit, or irrevocable letter of credit and in case of recoveries had by two (2) or more producers for violation of the conditions of this chapter in excess of the amount of the bond, certificate of deposit, or irrevocable letter of credit, such recovery shall be prorated and the total recovery for any one (1) annual licensing period shall not exceed the amount of the bond, certificate of deposit, or irrevocable letter of credit. In the event the director sues and obtains a judgment against the warehouseman and/or his surety or bank for payment of such damages under this chapter, he shall be entitled to recover a reasonable attorney’s fee.

§ 69-210. Designation of warehouse as bonded warehouse.

Upon the filing with and approval by the department of a bond, in compliance with this chapter, for the conduct of a warehouse, such warehouse shall be designated as bonded hereunder; but no warehouse shall be designated as bonded under this chapter, and no name or description conveying the impression that it is so bonded, shall be used, until a bond, such as provided for in section 69-208, Idaho Code, has been filed with and approved by the department, nor unless the license issued under this chapter for the conduct of such warehouse remains unsuspended and unrevoked.

§ 69-211. Fees of department.

The department shall charge, assess, and cause to be collected an annual fee for each warehouse license or renewal thereof, according to the following schedule:

The department shall assess and collect a fee of one hundred dollars ($100) for each inspection of a warehouse or station which is done for the purpose of amending a warehouse license.

The department shall assess and collect a fee of two hundred fifty dollars ($250) per day or fraction thereof for maintaining each employee of the department at a warehouse to oversee the correction of a violation of the provisions of this chapter or the rules promulgated hereunder.

Upon approval by the department, a warehouseman may operate two (2) or more warehouses under a single warehouse license.

All fees shall be deposited into the commodity indemnity fund.

For each original application —

Capacity in Hundredweight Rate

0 to 50,000 $180.00

50,001 to 100,000 360.00

100,001 to 250,000 540.00

250,001 to 500,000 715.00

500,001 to 750,000 890.00

Over 750,000 1,070.00

For each renewal application —

Capacity in Hundredweight Rate

0 to 50,000 $50.00

50,001 to 100,000 100.00

100,001 to 250,000 145.00

250,001 to 500,000 190.00

500,001 to 750,000 240.00

Over 750,000 290.00

§ 69-212. Schedule of charges — Posting.

Every licensed warehouseman shall annually, during the first week of July, publish by posting in a conspicuous place in his warehouse, a schedule of storage, handling, conditioning or any other charges or discounts for the ensuing year, which schedule shall be kept posted in a conspicuous place in said warehouse. Further, the warehouseman shall annually, during the first week in July, mail to the department, a copy of such charges. All charges made by any public warehouseman hereunder for the handling and storage of agricultural commodities shall be just, fair and reasonable; and the director is hereby vested with the power and authority upon the complaint of any person interested or upon his own motion, after a full hearing, to declare any existing charge for the handling or storage of any agricultural commodity to be unreasonable or unjust and to determine and order what shall be a just and reasonable charge to be imposed or enforced in place of that found to be unreasonable or unjust. Failure to file and post scheduled charges for the current year will keep in full force and effect the latest previously posted and filed schedule of rates.

§ 69-213. Privilege of examining commodities stored.

Every depositor having an interest in any agricultural commodity stored in any such warehouse, and every state inspector authorized by the director, shall have the right to examine at any reasonable time during ordinary business hours any commodity so stored, and all parts of such warehouses, provided the warehouse or the agricultural commodities stored therein is not endangered by such inspection; and every warehouseman, his agents and employees shall furnish safe and reasonable access and facilities for such examination.

§ 69-213A. Annual notification.

Beginning in the year 2005, on or before December 1 of each year, every licensed warehouseman shall send written notification to each individual having an interest in any agricultural commodity stored in their warehouse for a period of thirty-six (36) months or more, or having an interest in any open credit sales contract related to an agricultural commodity with the warehouseman, for the purpose of confirming said interest, which notification shall include the name of the individual, and the type and measurement of the agricultural commodity. Notification shall be sent by United States mail, postage prepaid to the last known address of each individual. Warehousemen shall maintain a record of the names and addresses of the individuals to whom notification was sent. A warehouseman may voluntarily elect to provide annual notification to any individual having an interest in any agricultural commodity stored in their warehouse for a period of less than thirty-six (36) months. Notwithstanding any other provision of this section, a warehouseman shall not be required to send annual notification to any individual having an interest in any agricultural commodity stored in their warehouse that was produced on lands owned by an Indian tribe as defined in section 67-4001, Idaho Code.

§ 69-214. Employment of personnel.

The department may employ such inspectors, investigators, samplers and weighers as it may deem necessary.

§ 69-215. Licenses to weigh commodities for storage.

Every warehouse licensed under this chapter shall have a weighmaster licensed pursuant to the provisions of the Weighmaster’s Licensing Act; provided, however, that if agricultural commodities are not received or delivered by a warehouse over scales, a weighmaster’s license shall not be required.

§ 69-216. Suspension or revocation of license to classify, grade or weigh products for storage. [Repealed.]

§ 69-217. Right to assess and collect fees.

The department shall have the right to assess and collect such fees as may be necessary to carry out the provisions of this chapter.

§ 69-218. Warehousemen to receive commodities according to capacity.

Every warehouseman conducting a warehouse licensed under this chapter shall receive for storage therein, so far as its capacity permits, any agricultural commodity of the kind customarily stored therein by him which may be tendered to him by historical depositors, bearing certificate, when required, of an official inspector showing suitable condition, for warehousing, in the usual manner in the ordinary and usual course of business. A warehouseman may accept agricultural commodities from new depositors who qualify to the extent of the capacity of the warehouse.

§ 69-219. Commodities deemed delivered subject to law.

Any person who delivers agricultural commodities to a warehouse licensed under this chapter, for storage or under terms of a contract, shall be deemed to have delivered the same subject to the terms of this chapter and the rules prescribed hereunder.

§ 69-220. Inspection and grading of diseased or insect infested commodities.

Any diseased or insect infested agricultural commodity complained of by the department or any person having interest in the warehouse or agricultural commodities stored in a warehouse licensed under this chapter shall be inspected and graded by a representative of the department or a person duly licensed to grade the same under this chapter, and if such inspection or grading shows such agricultural commodity to be in a condition that its continued storing or retention would injure or damage the warehouse or other commodities stored therein the owner shall, by order of the director, forthwith remove and dispose of such agricultural commodity as directed. If the owner of such commodity is unknown to the inspector or warehouseman, the warehouseman shall proceed to remove or make disposition of such commodity in a manner that will tend to save and realize the values contained in such commodity by the owner, under such rules and regulations as may be promulgated under this chapter or the uniform commercial code.

§ 69-221. Fungible products of different grades to be kept separate. [Repealed.]

§ 69-222. Receipts — Scale weight tickets.

For all agricultural commodities delivered to a warehouse licensed under this chapter original negotiable or nonnegotiable warehouse receipts, or scale weight tickets, shall be issued by the warehouseman conducting the same, but no receipts, or scale weight tickets, shall be issued except for agricultural commodities delivered to the warehouse at the time of the issuance thereof; provided, however, that no negotiable receipt need be issued except when requested by the depositor.

§ 69-223. Negotiable warehouse receipts for commodities stored — Contents — Conditions — Penalties.

Every negotiable warehouse receipt issued for agricultural commodities stored in a warehouse licensed under the provisions of this chapter shall be issued in accordance with, but not limited to, the following:

Every negotiable warehouse receipt issued for agricultural commodities stored in a warehouse licensed under the provisions of this chapter shall embody within its written or printed terms:

All the requirements of a negotiable warehouse receipt under the Uniform Commercial Code—Documents of Title.

A description of the agricultural commodities received, showing the quantity thereof, or, in case of agricultural commodities customarily put up in bales or packages, a description of such bales or packages by marks, numbers, or other means of identification and the weight of such bales or packages.

The grade or other class of the agricultural commodities received and the standard or description in accordance with which such classification has been made: provided that such grade or other class shall be stated according to the official standards of the state applicable to such agricultural commodities as the same may be fixed and promulgated under authority of law; provided further that until such official standards of the state for any agricultural commodity or commodities have been fixed and promulgated, the grade or other class thereof may be stated in accordance with any recognized standard; provided that unless otherwise required by law, when requested by the depositor of other than fungible agricultural commodities, a receipt omitting compliance with this subdivision may be issued if it has plainly and conspicuously embodied in its written or printed terms a provision that such negotiable warehouse receipt is not graded.

A statement that the negotiable warehouse receipt is issued subject to the provisions of this chapter and the rules prescribed hereunder.

Such other terms and conditions within the limitations of this chapter as may be required by the department.

All negotiable warehouse receipts issued under the provisions of this chapter shall be:

Upon forms prepared and supplied by the department and issued upon requisition of the warehouseman at a reasonable cost; or

In electronic form, through a system approved by the United States department of agriculture, accessible by the Idaho state department of agriculture, and all costs of implementation and other related costs shall be borne by the public warehouse, warehouse, warehouseman, or commodity dealer. Such electronic negotiable warehouse receipts shall have the same validity and enforceability as those in nonelectronic form and the terms “written” and “printed,” and derivatives thereof, when used in relation to negotiable warehouse receipts, shall include such receipts created or displayed electronically. The department is authorized to promulgate rules necessary for the implementation and operation of such electronic system.

§ 69-224. Standards for agricultural commodities.

The department is authorized, from time to time, to establish and promulgate standards for agricultural commodities by which their quality or value may be judged or determined.

So far as practicable such standards shall conform to the official standards of the United States or the state of Idaho applicable to such agricultural commodities as the same may from time to time be fixed and promulgated.

No warehouseman in this state shall insert in any receipt issued by him any language in any way limiting or modifying his liabilities, or responsibilities, as imposed by the laws of this state.

§ 69-225. Loss of receipts — Conditions of reissue.

While an original receipt issued under this chapter is outstanding and uncanceled by the warehouseman issuing the same no other or further receipt shall be issued for the agricultural commodity covered thereby or for any part thereof. In order to issue a new warehouse receipt supplementing one that has been lost or destroyed or to cancel an outstanding warehouse receipt that has been lost or destroyed, the licensed warehouseman shall require the depositor or other applicant to submit to the warehouseman: (1) an affidavit stating that he is lawfully entitled to possession of the original receipt, that he has not negotiated or assigned it and how the original receipt was lost or destroyed, and (2) a bond in an amount double the market value of the agricultural commodity represented by the lost or destroyed receipt. The market value shall be determined at the time this bond is submitted for the lost receipt. A warehouse receipt issued in lieu of a lost or destroyed receipt shall duplicate the original and bear a statement that it is issued in lieu of the lost or destroyed receipt. A duplicate receipt must clearly state on its face that it is a duplicate receipt, the number of the receipt it is replacing and the license number under which the original receipt was issued.

§ 69-226. Records of warehouses — Conduct of warehouses.

Every warehouseman conducting a warehouse licensed under the provisions of this chapter shall keep in a place of safety complete and correct records and shall conduct said warehouse in all other respects in compliance with this chapter and the rules promulgated hereunder.

§ 69-227. Examination of commodities or seed crops — Records — Publication of findings.

The department is authorized to cause examination to be made of any agricultural commodity or seed crop deposited, or any record pertaining to commodities or seed crops deposited therein, in any warehouse licensed under the provisions of this chapter. Whenever, after opportunity for hearing is given to the warehouseman conducting such warehouse, it is determined that he is not performing fully the duties imposed on him by this chapter and the rules promulgated hereunder, the department may publish its findings in a local daily or weekly newspaper in the area where the warehouse is located.

§ 69-228. Suspension or revocation of license.

The department may, after opportunity for hearing has been afforded to the licensee concerned, suspend or revoke any license issued to any person under the provisions of this chapter, for any violation of or failure to comply with any provision of this chapter, chapter 7 of the uniform commercial code or the rules promulgated hereunder or upon the ground that the licensee has used his license or allowed it to be used for any improper purpose. Pending investigation the department, whenever it deems necessary, may suspend a license temporarily without hearing.

§ 69-229. Publication of reports.

The department from time to time may publish the results of any investigations made under the provisions of this chapter; and it may publish the names and addresses of persons licensed under this chapter and a list of all licenses terminated under this chapter and the causes therefore [therefor].

§ 69-230. Examination of books — Authorization to copy.

The department is authorized through officials, employees, or agents of the department designated by it, to examine and make copies of all books, records, papers, and accounts of warehouses relating thereto, including those described in section 69-227, Idaho Code.

§ 69-231. Rules.

The department shall from time to time promulgate such rules as it may deem necessary for the efficient execution of the provisions of this chapter.

§ 69-232. Cooperation with governmental agencies and private associations.

The director may cooperate with and enter into agreements with governmental agencies of this state, other states, agencies of the federal government, and private associations in order to carry out the purpose and provisions of this chapter and the United States warehouse act (7 U.S.C.A. section 241, et seq.). Notwithstanding any other provisions of this chapter, such agreements may also relate to a joint program for licensing, bonding and inspecting stations. Such a program should be designed to avoid duplication of effort on the part of the licensing authority and requirements for operation, and promote more efficient enforcement of the provisions of this chapter and comparable provisions of the laws of the states of Oregon, Washington, Montana, Wyoming, Utah and Nevada and the province of British Columbia, Canada.

§ 69-233. Violation of law — Penalty.

Any person who violates any provision of this chapter or the rules promulgated hereunder, or who shall impede, obstruct, hinder or otherwise prevent or attempt to prevent the director or his duly authorized representative in the performance of his duty in connection with the provisions of this chapter, except as provided in sections 69-204, 69-212, 69-223 and 69-248, Idaho Code, shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and be punished by imprisonment in a county jail not to exceed six (6) months, or by a fine of not more than one thousand dollars ($1,000), or by both.

§ 69-234. Rent of quarters — Employment of assistants.

The department is authorized to rent quarters and to employ persons as it may deem necessary, and it is authorized, in its discretion, to employ qualified persons not regularly in the service of the state for temporary assistance in carrying out the purposes of this chapter.

§ 69-235. Effect of partial invalidity of law.

If any clause, sentence, paragraph, or part of this chapter shall, for any reason, be adjudged by any court of competent jurisdiction to be invalid, such judgment shall not affect, impair, or invalidate the remainder thereof, but shall be confined in its operation to the clause, sentence, paragraph or part thereof directly involved in the controversy in which such judgment shall have been rendered.